en: Granny smith apple juice
it: succo di mela Granny Smith

en: apple jam
de: Apfelmarmelade
es: mermelada de manzana
fr: confiture de pommes
hr: džem od jabuka
it: confettura di mele, marmellata di mele, confettura alle mele
nl: appeljam
pt: geleia de maçã
ru: повидло яблочное, яблочное повидло

en: apple with orange juice
hr: jabuka sa sokom od naranče
it: succo di arance e mele, succo d'arance e mele, succo di mele e arance, succo con mele e arance, succo con arance e mele

en: apple wine
hr: vino od jabuke
it: vino di mele, vino di mela

en: apple preparation
hr: pripravak s jabukama
it: preparato di mele

en: apple filling
hr: punjenje od jabuke
it: ripieno di mele

en: boabab, boabab fruit
es: boabab fruto
it: baobab

en: citrus fibre, citrus fibres
bg: цитрусови влакнини
da: citrusfibre
de: citrusfaser, zitrusfaser, Zitrusfasern, Zitrusfruchtfasern, Citrusfasern
fi: sitruskuitu
fr: fibre d'agrume, fibre végétale d'agrumes, fibres d'agrumes, fibres d'agrume
hr: citrusna vlakna, vlakna citrusa
it: fibra di agrumi, fibra di agrume, fibre di agrumi
nl: citrusvezel, citrusvezels
no: sitrusfiber
pl: błonnik cytrusowy, błonnik z owoców cytrusowych, błonnik z cytrusów
ro: fibră de citrice
sv: citrusfiber, citrusfibrer

en: citrus fruit, citrus
af: Sitrus
ar: حمضيات
az: Sitrus
bg: цитруси
ca: cítric
cs: Citrus
cv: Цитрус
cy: Sitrws
da: Citrus
de: Zitrusfrucht, Zitrusfruchten
el: Κίτρος
eo: Citruso
es: cítricos
et: Tsitrus, tsitrused
eu: Garrazki
fa: مرکبات
fi: sitrushedelmä, sitrus
fr: agrume, agrumes, Citrus
ga: Toradh citris
gl: Cítrico
he: הדרים
hi: निम्बू-वंश
hr: citrus
hu: Citrus
hy: ցիտրուսայիններ
id: Jeruk
is: Sítrus
it: agrumi, agrume
ja: ミカン属
jv: Sitrus
ka: ციტრუსოვანი კულტურები
kk: Цитрус
ko: 귤속
ku: Narinc
la: Citrus
ln: Lindímo
lt: Citrinmedis
lv: citrusaugi
mk: цитрус
ml: നാരകം
ms: Limau
nb: Sitrusfrukt
nl: citrusvrucht, citrusvruchten, citrus
nn: Sitrusfrukt
oc: Citrus
pl: Cytrusy, cytrus, cytrusowy
pt: Citrus
ro: Citrice
ru: цитрус
se: Sitrusšaddosat
sh: Agrumi
sk: Citrus
sl: Citrus
sq: Citrus
sr: цитрус
su: Jeruk
sv: Citrussläktet
ta: சிட்ரசு
te: సిట్రస్
tg: ситрус
th: สกุลส้ม
tl: Citrus
tr: Narenciye
uk: цитрус
vi: Chi Cam chanh
yi: ציטרוס פרוכט
zh: 柑橘属

en: citrus fruit juice
de: Saft aus Zitrusfrüchten
fr: jus d'agrumes à base de concentrés
hr: sok od agruma
it: succo di agrumi

en: citrus fruit extract
de: Citrusextrakt
fi: sitrushedelmäuute
fr: Extrait d'agrumes
hr: ekstrakt citrusnog voća
it: estratto di agrumi, estratti di agrumi, estratti di agrume, estratto di agrume

en: citrus flavouring
cs: citrusové aroma
de: Zitrusfruchtaroma, Zitrusfrucht-Aroma
es: aroma de cítricos, aroma cítrico
fi: sitrusaromi
fr: arôme d'agrume
hr: aroma citrusa
hu: citrus aroma
it: aroma di agrumi
pl: aromat cytrusowy, aromat z cytrusów

en: natural citrus flavouring
cs: přírodní citrusová aroma, přírodní citrusové aroma
de: natürliches Citrusaroma, natürliches Zitrusaroma, natürliche Zitrusfruchtaromen
es: aroma natural de cítricos
fi: luontainen sitrusaromi
fr: arôme naturel d'agrumes, arômes naturels d'agrumes
hr: prirodna citrus aroma
hu: természetes citrus aroma, természetes citrusaroma
it: aroma naturale di agrumi
nl: natuurlijke aroma's van citrusvruchten
pl: naturalny aromat cytrusowy, naturalny aromat z cytrusów, naturalny aromat owoców cytrusowych
sv: naturlig citronarom

en: citrus oil
sv: citrusolja

en: cashew apples
bg: плодове на кашу
cs: plodů kešu
da: kasjufrugt
de: Kaschuäpfeln
el: ανακάρδιο
es: manzana de cajú
et: akažuuõunte
fi: cashew-omenaa
fr: anacardes
hr: oraščićevu jabuku, kajušku jabuku
hu: kasualma
it: pomo di acagiù
lt: anakardžių
lv: kešjukoka augļiem
mt: tuffieħ tal-cashew
nl: cashewappelen
pl: owoców nerkowca
pt: caju
ro: alunelor de caju
sk: jabĺčka kešu
sl: granatna jabolka
sv: cashewäpplen

en: Citrus unshiu
ar: برتقال ساتسوما
bg: Сацума
ca: Citrus unshiu
cv: Уншиу (мандарин)
de: Satsuma
eo: Mikano
es: Citrus unshiu
fr: Mandarine satsuma
hr: citrus unshiu
it: Citrus unshiu
ja: ウンシュウミカン, うんしゅうみかん
ko: 온주귤
nl: Satsuma
pl: Mandarynka Satsuma
pt: Mikan
ro: Mikan
ru: Мандарин уншиу
so: Liin Beydarin
sv: Satsuma
tr: Satsuma
uk: Мандарин Уншіу
vi: Satsuma
zh: 温州蜜柑

en: clementine, clementins
ar: كليمونتين
bg: Клементина, клементини
bo: ཚ་ལི་མ་ཆུང་བའི་རིགས།
ca: clementina
co: Clementina
cs: Klementinka
cv: Клементина
da: Klementin, Klementiner
de: Clementine, Clementinen
eo: Klementinujo
es: clementina
et: Klementiin
eu: Klementinondo
fi: klementiini, klementiinit
fr: clémentine, clémentines
gl: clementina
he: קלמנטינה
hr: klementina
it: clementina
ja: クレメンタイン
kv: Клементин
lt: Klementinai
nb: Klementin
nl: clementine
nn: Klementin
ro: Clemantină
ru: Клементин
sl: Klementina
sv: Clementin
th: คลีเมนไทน์
uk: Клементин
vi: Clementine
zh: 克里曼丁红橘

fr: jus de clémentine
de: Clementinensaft
fi: klementiinimehu

en: grapefruit
af: pomelo
am: በትረ ሎሚ
ar: ليمون فردوسي
az: qreypfrut
be: грэйпфрут
bg: грейпфрут
bi: grepfrut
bs: grejpfrut
ca: aranger
co: pumelu
cs: grapefruit
cv: грейпфрут
cy: grawnffrwyth
da: grapefrugt, grape
de: Grapefruit, Grapefruits
el: γκρέιπφρουτ
eo: grapfrukto
et: greip
eu: arabisagarra, pomeloa, panplemuza
fa: گریپ‌فروت
fi: greippi
fj: molijamu
fr: pamplemousse
ga: seadóg
gl: pomelo
he: אשכולית
hi: अंगूरफल
hr: grejp, grejpa
hu: grépfrút
hy: թուրինջ
id: limau gedang
it: pompelmo
ja: グレープフルーツ
jv: jeruk manis
ka: გრეიპფრუტი
kg: dilalanzi
kk: грейпфрут, greýpfrwt, گرەيپفرۋت
kn: ದ್ರಾಕ್ಷಿ ಹಣ್ಣು
ko: 그레이프프루트
ku: greyfûrt, گرەیفوورت
kv: грейпфрут
la: malum paradisi
ln: lilála lya ngai
lt: greipfrutas
lv: greipfrūts
ms: limau gedang
my: ဂရိပ်ဖရုပင်
nb: grapefrukt
ne: शङ्खेत्रो
nl: grapefruit
nn: grapefrukt
nv: chʼil łitsxooí ntsxaaígíí
os: грейпфрут
pl: grejpfrut
pt: toranja, pamplumossa
ro: grepfrut
ru: грейпфрут
sh: grejpfrut
sk: grapefruit
sl: grenivka
so: liin bambeelmo
sr: грејпфрут, grejpfrut
sv: grapefrukt
sw: mbalungi
te: పంపరపనస
tg: грейпфрут
th: เกรปฟรูต
tr: greyfurt
uk: грейпфрут
uz: greypfrut
vi: bưởi chùm
yi: גרייפפרוכט
zh: 西柚

en: grapefruit pulp
fr: pulpe de pamplemousse
it: polpa di pompelmo